Other/dictionaries/mt_MT.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwżġċħ'
FLAG long

# ==========================================
# 1. MALTESE DEFINITE ARTICLES (PREFIXES)
# ==========================================
PFX AA Y 1
PFX AA 0 l- .

PFX AB Y 1
PFX AB 0 il- .

PFX AC Y 9
PFX AC 0 it- t
PFX AC 0 id- d
PFX AC 0 ir- r
PFX AC 0 is- s
PFX AC 0 iż- ż
PFX AC 0 ix- x
PFX AC 0 iċ- ċ
PFX AC 0 in- n
PFX AC 0 iz- z

# ==========================================
# 2. PREPOSITION + ARTICLE COMBINATIONS
# ==========================================
PFX BA Y 5
PFX BA 0 b' .
PFX BA 0 f' .
PFX BA 0 ta' .
PFX BA 0 ma' .
PFX BA 0 għal- .

PFX BB Y 4
PFX BB 0 bil- .
PFX BB 0 fil- .
PFX BB 0 tal- .
PFX BB 0 mal- .

# ==========================================
# 3. VERB NEGATION (ma + word + x)
# ==========================================
PFX NE Y 1
PFX NE 0 ma\  .

SFX NX Y 1
SFX NX 0 x .

# ==========================================
# 4. PRONOMINAL MORPHOLOGY (SUFFIXES)
# ==========================================

# --- BLOCK A: Suffixes for words ending in a CONSONANT ---
# Example base words: "dar" (house), "vroma" -> root "vrom", "ġab" (he brought)
SFX PC Y 6
SFX PC 0 i .       # my      (dar -> dari)
SFX PC 0 ek .      # your    (dar -> darek)
SFX PC 0 u .       # his     (dar -> daru)
SFX PC 0 ha .      # her     (dar -> darha)
SFX PC 0 na .      # our     (dar -> darna)
SFX PC 0 hom .     # their   (dar -> darhom)

# --- BLOCK B: Suffixes for words ending in a VOWEL ---
# Example base words: "vroma" (drop the 'a' or append), "rajna" (we saw)
# Rules can strip the trailing vowel using the syntax: SFX flag [strip] [append] [condition]
SFX PV Y 5
SFX PV a ja a      # my      (vroma -> vromja)
SFX PV 0 k [aeiou] # your    (rajna -> rajnak)
SFX PV 0 h [aeiou] # his     (rajna -> rajnah)
SFX PV 0 ha [aeiou]# her     (rajna -> rajnaha)
SFX PV 0 hom [aeiou]# their  (rajna -> rajnahom)

# --- BLOCK C: Double Object Pronoun Suffixes for Verbs ---
# Example: "ġab" (he brought) + "li" (to me) + "ha" (it) -> "ġabhali"
SFX VD Y 3
SFX VD 0 li .      # to me   (ġab -> ġabli)
SFX VD 0 lha .     # to her  (ġab -> ġablha)
SFX VD 0 lhom .    # to them (ġab -> ġablhom)
